Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-6,107
Excise tax; amount.

(1) In addition to the tax imposed pursuant to sections 66-6,108, 66-6,109, and 66-6,109.02, an excise tax in an amount set in subsection (2) of this section is levied and imposed on all compressed fuel sold for use in registered motor vehicles.

(2) The tax shall be:

(a) Seven and one-half cents per gallon or gallon equivalent through December 31, 2015;

(b) Eight cents per gallon or gallon equivalent beginning on January 1, 2016, through December 31, 2016;

(c) Eight and one-half cents per gallon or gallon equivalent beginning on January 1, 2017, through December 31, 2017;

(d) Nine cents per gallon or gallon equivalent beginning on January 1, 2018, through December 31, 2018; and

(e) Nine and one-half cents per gallon or gallon equivalent beginning on January 1, 2019.

Laws 1995, LB 182, § 11;

Laws 2004, LB 983, § 41;

Laws 2008, LB846, § 16;

Laws 2015, LB610, § 5.